California statutes. Education Code
(3) A comparison of the salary and benefits of each retiree receiving the additional service credit with the salary and benefits of the replacement employee, if any.

(4) The resulting retirement costs, including interest, if any, and postretirement healthcare benefits costs, incurred by the employer.

(d) The chancellor shall annually prepare a cost analysis,
 based upon the information included in the audit reports for the prior fiscal year, to determine the net savings or costs resulting from formal actions taken by community college districts pursuant to Sections 22714 and 87488, and shall report the results of the cost analysis to the Governor and the Legislature by April 1 of each year.

(e) All costs incurred by the board of governors to implement subdivision (c) shall be absorbed by the board of governors.

(f) At the request of the Department of Finance, each community college district that elects to take formal action pursuant to Sections 22714 and 87488, shall reimburse the Department of Finance for any related administrative costs incurred by the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 31.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

84040.6.

On June 30, 1991, and each year thereafter, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall report to the Joint Legislative Audit Committee on (1) the number and nature of audit exceptions and estimated amount of funds involved in the exceptions, (2) a list of districts which failed to file their audits pursuant to Section 84040, and (3) the actions taken by the department to eliminate audit exceptions and comply with management improvement recommendations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 640.)
-------------------------------------------

84041.

(a) The board of governors may request the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team (FCMAT) established pursuant to Section 42127.8 to assist a community college district to establish or maintain sound financial and budgetary conditions and to comply with principles of sound fiscal management.

(b) The board of governors may recommend additional persons with expertise in community college fiscal accountability to serve as part of a FCMAT operation for the purposes of this section.

(c) The board of governors may request FCMAT to assist a community college district as follows:

(1) Whenever regulations adopted by the board of governors authorize contracting for a management review of the district and its educational programs or an audit of the financial conditions of the district.

(2) To provide management or fiscal crisis intervention, or both, for a community college district where a crisis presents an imminent threat to the fiscal integrity and security of that district. In these cases, the FCMAT shall have the authority, subject to regulations adopted by the board of governors, to stay or rescind any action of the district’s governing board that is inconsistent with the district’s fiscal integrity and security.

(d) The FCMAT shall submit a progress report to the affected district, to the board of governors, and to the chancellor at least every six months, or more frequently if that is required by the chancellor.

(e) Each community college district that receives assistance at the request of the board of governors under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) shall be required to pay the full cost incurred by the unit for these purposes.

(f) If the board of governors requests the assistance of the FCMAT pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the chancellor shall provide the board of governors with a report that includes all of the following:

(1) An assessment of which events or activities led to the crisis.

(2) An action plan for addressing the deficiencies of the district.

(3) A process for assessing district progress in correcting deficiencies.

(4) Benchmarks that indicate the presence of local capacity to manage the fiscal responsibilities of the district.

(g) (1) Irrespective of whether the FCMAT has been requested by the board of governors to assist a district under this section, a district may request the FCMAT to do either or both of the following at district expense, in accordance with paragraph (2):

(A) Provide fiscal management assistance.

(B) Facilitate training for members of the district governing board and for any district employees whose responsibilities include addressing fiscal issues. Training services shall emphasize efforts to improve fiscal accountability and to expand the fiscal competency of the trainees.

(2) Each community college district that receives assistance at its request under this subdivision shall be required to pay the full cost incurred by the unit for that purpose.

(h) The board of governors shall develop and adopt any regulations that are necessary for the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 360, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

84042.

Except as provided in this section, any election held for the purpose of permitting a community college district to exceed the expenditure of district funds fixed by the Constitution or by the statutes of the state shall be called, held, and conducted as nearly as possible as are elections for the issuance of district bonds.

The notice of election shall contain only the following:

(a) The time and place or places of holding the election.

(b) The names of the officers appointed to conduct the election.

(c) The hours during the day in which the polls will be open.

(d) The amount by which it is proposed to increase the expenditures of the district during the school year.

(e) The total amount of proposed expenditures of the district, including the proposed increase, for the school year.

The ballots used at the election shall contain the following language: “Shall the total authorized expenditures of the district be increased from ____ (naming the sum) to ____ (naming the sum) for the school year ____ (naming the school year)?”

The hours during which the polls at the election are open shall be fixed in accordance with Section 14212 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

84043.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and unless otherwise prohibited under federal law, for the 2009–10 to 2014–15 fiscal years, inclusive, community college districts may use funding received, pursuant to subdivision (b), from any of the programs listed in paragraph (2) that are contained in Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the annual Budget Act, for the purposes of any of the programs contained in Schedule (2) and Schedules (4) to (23), inclusive, of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2009.

(2) (A) Academic Senate for the Community Colleges.

(B) Equal Employment Opportunity.

(C) Part-time Faculty Health Insurance.

(D) Part-time Faculty Compensation.

(E) Part-time Faculty Office Hours.

(F) Economic Development.

(G) Transfer Education and Articulation.

(H) Physical Plant and Instructional Support.

(I) Campus Childcare Tax Bailout.

(b) For the 2009–10 to 2014–15 fiscal years, inclusive, the chancellor shall apportion from the amounts provided in the annual Budget Act for the programs enumerated in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), an amount to a community college district,
 based on the same relative proportion that the community college district received in the 2008–09 fiscal year for the programs enumerated in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The amounts allocated shall be adjusted for any greater or lesser amount appropriated for the items enumerated in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) This section does not obligate the state to refund or repay reductions made pursuant to this section. A decision by a community college district to reduce funding pursuant to this section for a state-mandated local program shall constitute a waiver of the subvention of funds that the community college district is otherwise entitled to pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution on the amount so reduced.

(2) If a community college district elects to use funding received pursuant to
 subdivision (b) in the manner authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), the governing board of the community college district shall, at a regularly scheduled open public hearing, take testimony from the public, discuss, and shall approve or disapprove the proposed use of funding.

(3) (A) If a community college district elects to use funding received pursuant to subdivision (b) in the manner authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), the community college district shall continue to report the expenditures pursuant to this section by using the appropriate codes to indicate the activities for which these funds were expended using the existing standard reporting process as determined by the chancellor.

(B) The chancellor shall collect the information in subparagraph (A) and shall provide that information to the Department of Finance and to the appropriate policy and
 budget committees of the Legislature on or before April 15, 2010, and annually thereafter by April 15 of each year, through 2016.

(d) For the 2009–10 to 2014–15 fiscal years, inclusive, community college districts that elect to use funding in the manner authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be in compliance with the program and funding requirements contained in statutory, regulatory, and provisional language, associated with the programs enumerated in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 48, Sec. 72.   (AB 86)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

84044.

(a) No later than December 31 of each fiscal year, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit reports to the Department of Finance and the Legislature on the use of funds appropriated in the Budget Act for the prior fiscal year for the following purposes:

(1) The Student Success for Basic Skills Students program, including any outcomes associated with the use of funds.

(2) The Student Financial Aid Administration program, including the distribution of the funds, specific uses of the funds, strategies employed to reach low-income and disadvantaged students potentially eligible for financial aid, the extent to which
 community college districts were successful in increasing the number of students accessing financial aid, and the impact on student enrollment.

(3) The technical assistance provided to community college districts pursuant to the Student Success and Support Program.

(4) The Telecommunications and Technology Infrastructure program, including summaries of allocations and expenditures by program and by community college district.

(b) Reports to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 22, Sec. 13.   (SB 81)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Property Valuations for Allocations [84205.5. - 84207.]

84205.5.

For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, the “full cash value” of all property in a community college district shall include the assessed valuation of all real properties in those territories or components which subsequent to the 1975–76 fiscal year became a part of the community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

84207.

On or before November 15 of each year, the county auditor of each county shall furnish to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges the actual previous year’s receipts, along with estimated current year receipts for secured tax receipts, unsecured tax receipts, prior year tax receipts, timber tax receipts, and any other appropriate taxes or subventions for each community college district or portion of a district situated within his or her county. This information shall be forwarded on forms prescribed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 651.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State School Fund [84320. - 84362.]



  ARTICLE 3. Duties of the Chancellor [84320. - 84328.]

84320.

The board of governors shall adopt regulations providing for the payment of apportionments to districts on a schedule to include an advance apportionment and a first and second principal apportionment. Unless and until the dates related to these apportionments are amended in consultation with the Department of Finance, the regulations shall provide for the following schedule of payments as provided in this section:

(a) The board of governors shall certify estimated apportionments to the Controller on or before July 15 of each year.

(b) The first principal apportionment shall be certified on or before February 20 of each year, at which time shall also be made any final apportionment and recalculation of prior years, as applicable.

(c) The second principal apportionment shall be certified on or before June 25 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

84321.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2003–04 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June, for general apportionments in the amount of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) and for the Partnership for Excellence in the amount of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), shall instead be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made under Section 84320.

(b) For the purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants drawn pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 216, Sec. 23.   Effective August 11, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

84321.62.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law that governs the regulations adopted by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to disburse funds, the payment of apportionments to community college districts pursuant to Section 84320 shall be adjusted, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, by the following:

(1) For the month of June, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be deferred to July.

(2) For the month of May, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be deferred to
 July.

(3) For the month of April, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be deferred to July.

(4) For the month of March, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be deferred to August.

(5) For the month of February, two hundred fifty-three million two hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($253,243,000) shall be deferred to
 August.

(b) The sum of one billion four hundred fifty-three million two hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($1,453,243,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for apportionments to community college districts, for expenditure
 in the 2021–22 fiscal year to be expended in accordance with the applicable schedules of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2020.

(c) Of the funds appropriated in subdivision (b), nine hundred million dollars ($900,000,000) shall be allocated in
 July and five hundred fifty-three million two hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($553,243,000) shall be allocated in August of the 2021–22 fiscal year in satisfaction of the moneys deferred pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) (1) The chancellor may adjust the monthly schedule described in subdivision (a)
 for the 2020–21 fiscal year to increase the amount deferred in a specified month if it ensures a shorter time between a deferred payment and repayment.

(2) If adjusting the monthly schedule, the chancellor shall not exceed the total amount of deferred payments described in subdivision (a).

(e) Pursuant to Section 8.28 of the Budget Act of 2020, if the Director of Finance determines that there are sufficient federal funds provided to the state for the 2020–21 fiscal year that may be used to offset the deferral of payments in the amount specified in that section, the Director of Finance shall reduce the amounts reflected in subdivisions (a) to (c),
 inclusive.
 In reducing these amounts, the Director of Finance shall first reduce the amounts deferred from any months occurring earliest in the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(f) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, one hundred forty-four million six hundred five thousand dollars ($144,605,000) of the appropriation made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the
 2019–20
 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(g) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, one billion seventy-eight million eight hundred fifty-eight thousand dollars ($1,078,858,000) of the appropriation made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(h) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, two hundred twenty-nine million seven hundred eighty thousand dollars ($229,780,000) of the appropriation made
 by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 61.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

84321.63.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, including any law that governs the regulations adopted by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to disburse funds, the payment of apportionments to community college districts pursuant to Section 84320 shall be adjusted, for the 2023–24 fiscal year, by paragraph (2).

(2) For the month of June, four hundred forty-six million four hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars ($446,427,000) shall be deferred to July.

(b) The sum of four hundred forty-six million four hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars ($446,427,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California
 Community Colleges for apportionments to community college districts, for expenditure in the 2024–25 fiscal year to be expended in accordance with the applicable schedules of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2023.

(c) (1) The chancellor may adjust the monthly schedule described in subdivision (a) for the 2023–24 fiscal year to increase the amount deferred in the month of June if it allows a shorter time between a deferred payment and repayment.

(2) If adjusting the monthly schedule, the chancellor shall not exceed the total amount of deferred payments described in subdivision (a).

(d) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, four hundred forty-six million four hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars
 ($446,427,000) of the appropriation made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 71, Sec. 5.   (SB 155)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

84321.64.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law that governs the regulations adopted by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to disburse funds, the payment of apportionments to community college districts pursuant to Section 84320 shall be adjusted, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, by paragraph (2).

(2) For the month of June, two hundred forty-three million six hundred ninety-three thousand dollars ($243,693,000) shall be deferred to July.

(b) The sum of two hundred forty-three million six hundred ninety-three thousand dollars ($243,693,000) is
 appropriated as described in subdivision (d) for apportionments to community college districts, for expenditure in the 2025–26 fiscal year to be expended in accordance with the applicable schedules of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024.

(c) (1) The chancellor may adjust the monthly schedule described in subdivision (a) for the 2024–25 fiscal year to increase the amount deferred in the month of June if it ensures a shorter time between a deferred payment and repayment.

(2) If adjusting the monthly schedule, the chancellor shall not exceed the total amount of deferred payments described in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) Of the amount described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to be paid in July 2025, one hundred six million eight hundred ninety thousand dollars ($106,890,000) is appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Ch. 77, Stats. 2025), and one hundred thirty-six million eight hundred three thousand dollars ($136,803,000) is appropriated in Provision 3 of
 Item 6870-488 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Ch. 5, Stats. 2025).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 745, Sec. 6.   (SB 148)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

84321.65.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law that governs the regulations adopted by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to disburse funds, the payment of apportionments to community college districts pursuant to Section 84320 shall be adjusted, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, as follows:

(1) For the month of June, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be deferred to July.

(2) For the month of May, one hundred eight million three hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($108,363,000) shall be deferred to July.

(b) The sum of four hundred eight million three hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($408,363,000) is hereby
 appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for apportionments to community college districts, for expenditure in the 2026–27 fiscal year to be expended in accordance with the applicable schedules of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025.

(c) (1) The chancellor may adjust the monthly schedule described in subdivision (a) for the 2025–26 fiscal year to increase the amount deferred in the months of May and June if it ensures a shorter time between a deferred payment and repayment.

(2) If adjusting the monthly schedule, the chancellor shall not exceed the total amount of deferred payments described in subdivision (a).

(d) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California
 Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the
 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 20.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

84321.7.

(a) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, up to thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for any of the months of February, March, April, May or June, that are instead to be drawn in the applicable months of the following fiscal year pursuant to Section 84321.62, may be drawn in February, March, April, May, or June, as applicable, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a community college district as follows:

(1) In order for a community college district to receive a payment in February, March, April, May, or June pursuant to this section, the community college district shall certify to the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and to the Director of Finance at
 least two months before the applicable deferral that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 84321.62 will result in the community college district being unable to meet its financial obligations for any of the months of February, March, April, May, or June, as applicable, and shall provide the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the community college district to meet its financial obligations for the months of February, March, April, May, or June, as applicable.

(2) The criteria, as applicable, set forth in statute and regulations to qualify a community college district for an emergency apportionment shall be used to make the certification specified in paragraph (1).

(3) A community college district may receive, pursuant to this section, no more than the lesser of the following:

(A) The total amount of additional funds necessary for the community college district to meet its financial obligations for any of the months of February, March, April, May, or June, as reported to the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) The total payments the community college district is entitled to receive in the applicable deferral month pursuant to Section 84321.62.

(b) If the total amount requested by community college districts pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) exceeds thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for any of the applicable deferral months, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to community college districts pursuant to this section shall not
 exceed sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) for any of the applicable deferral months. No later than one month before the applicable deferral, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) to a community college district. In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the scope of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(c) If the total amount of cash
 made available pursuant to subdivision (b) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), payments to community college districts shall be prorated.

(d) Payments pursuant to this section shall be made by the Controller no later than the last business day of the months of February, March, April, May, or June, as applicable.

(e) By August 1 of each year, commencing in 2021, the Department of Finance, in collaboration with the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the following information by each community college district that, in the prior fiscal year, requested an exemption to the deferral of payments:

(1) The amount requested for each applicable month pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) The amount received for each applicable month pursuant to this section. and, if the request was not granted, the reason for the denial.

(f) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 41202, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants drawn pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are required to be drawn pursuant to Section 84321.62, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are
 required to be drawn pursuant to Section 84321.62.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 25, Sec. 8.   (SB 116)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

84322.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a community college district may recognize, for budgetary and financial reporting purposes, any amount of state appropriations deferred from the current fiscal year and appropriated in the subsequent fiscal year for payment of current-year costs as a receivable in the current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 227, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

84323.

Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district may recognize for budgetary and financial reporting purposes any amount of state allocations described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of, or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of, Section 41206.04 in the fiscal year in which it was received.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 94.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

84328.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall certify each apportionment made by it to the Controller.

(b) The board of governors shall furnish an abstract of each apportionment of the State School Fund to the Controller, the Department of Finance, and to the county and city and county auditors, county and city and county treasurers, and to the county superintendents of schools of the several counties of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Use of Apportionments [84361. - 84362.]

84361.

If at the end of any fiscal year during which the schools of a community college district have been maintained for the period required or permitted by law, there is standing to the credit of the district an unexpended balance of money received from the State School Fund, it may be expended for the payment of claims against the district outstanding, or it may be expended during the succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

84362.

(a) As used in this section, “salaries of classroom instructors” means:

(1) The salary paid to each instructor employed by the district whose duties require that the full time for which the instructor is employed be devoted to the instruction of students of the district.

(2) The portion of the salary of each instructor whose duties require that a part, but not all, of the full time for which the instructor is employed be devoted to the instruction of students of the district, which is equal to the portion of the full time actually devoted by the instructor to teaching students of the district.

(3) The salary paid to each instructional aide employed by the district, any portion of whose duties are required to be performed under the supervision of an instructor. However, the cost of all health and welfare benefits provided to the instructors by the community college district shall be included within the meaning of “salaries of classroom instructors.”

(b) (1) As used in this section, an “instructor” means an employee of the district employed in a position requiring minimum qualifications and whose duties require him or her to teach students of the district for at least one full instructional period each schoolday for which the employee is employed. An instructional period is the number of minutes equal to the number of minutes of the regular academic period in the community college in which the instructor is employed.

(2) As used in this section, “administrator” means any employee in a position having significant responsibilities for formulating district policies or administering district programs; and “supervisor” means any employee having authority, on behalf of the district, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, discipline other employees, adjust their grievances, or effectively recommend that action, if the exercise of the authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature.

(c) “Current expense of education” means the gross total expended (not reduced by estimated income or estimated federal and state apportionments) for the purposes classified in the final budget of a district (except one which, during the preceding fiscal year, had less than 101 units of full-time equivalent student) for academic salaries other than academic salaries for student transportation, food services, and community services; classified salaries other than classified salaries for student transportation, food services, and community services; employee benefits other than employee benefits for student transportation personnel, food services personnel, and community services personnel; books, supplies, and equipment replacement other than for student transportation and food services; and community services, contracted services, and other operating expenses other than for student transportation, food services, and community services. “Current expense of education,” for purposes of this section, shall not include those expenditures classified as sites, buildings, books, and media and new equipment (object of expenditure 6000 of the Accounting Manual for California Community Colleges), the amount expended from categorical aid received from the federal or state government which funds were granted for expenditures in a program not incurring any instructor salary expenditures or requiring disbursement of the funds without regard to the requirements of this section, or expenditures for facility acquisition and construction; and shall not include the amount expended pursuant to any lease agreement for plant and equipment or the amount expended from funds received from the federal government pursuant to the “Economic Opportunity Act of 1964” or any extension of that act of Congress or the amount expended by a community college from state or federal funds received by the community college for grants to community college students or for the employment of community college students.

(d) There shall be expended during each fiscal year for payment of salaries of classroom instructors by a community college district, 50 percent of the district’s current expense of education.

(e) If the board of governors determines that a district has not expended the applicable percentage of current expense of education for the payment of salaries of classroom instructors during the preceding fiscal year, the board shall, in apportionments made to the district from the State School Fund after April 15 of the current fiscal year, designate an amount of the apportionment or apportionments equal to the apparent deficiency in district expenditures. Any amount so designated by the board of governors shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the community college district, but shall be unavailable for expenditure by the district pending the determination to be made by the board of governors on any application for exemption which may be submitted to the board of governors. In the event it appears to the governing board of a community college district that the application of the preceding subdivisions during a fiscal year results in serious hardship to the district, or in the payment of salaries of classroom instructors in excess of the salaries of classroom instructors paid by other districts of comparable type and functioning under comparable conditions, the governing board may apply to the board of governors, in writing, not later than September 15th of the immediately succeeding fiscal year for exemption from the requirements of this section.

(f) Immediately upon applying for the exemption described in subdivision (e), the governing board shall provide the exclusive representative of the district’s academic employees or, if none exists, the district or college academic senate, and all academic employee organizations eligible for payroll dues deduction, with a copy of the application. The exclusive representative, or the district or college academic senate, and all academic employee organizations eligible for payroll dues deduction, within 30 days of its receipt of the application, may transmit to the board of governors a written statement opposing the application, setting forth reasons for its opposition.
